dictionaries/oc_FR/oc_FR.dic
absolgut/y	di:*	id:612
acantonar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:775
accentuar/MTLQNaz	po:v1	di:*	id:877
aceirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:893
aclimatar/DlS	po:v1	di:*	id:64302
aculturar/SMTLQNa	po:v1	di:*	id:89828
adarreirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:1397
admetre/SMTLQNth	po:v3	di:*	id:1453
aflaquir/SMTLQNi	po:v2	di:*	id:1867
agimbar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:2199
aimantar/SMTLQNa	po:v1	di:*	id:2670
albeirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:2961
alcoolemia/slD	po:nom	is:fem	di:*	id:77164
aleugeirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:3130
aliar/MTLQNaz	po:v1	di:*	id:3186
alièchi/MTLQNc	po:v1	di:*	id:3190
alotgèri/MTLQNw	di:*	id:3286
amorteirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:3924
amourai/MTLQNx	di:*	id:3966
amplificar/MTLQNg	po:v1	di:*	id:3978
amudir/SMTLQNi	po:v2	di:*	id:3995
aparteni/MTLQNu	di:*	id:4533
aparteniái/MTLQNv	po:v3	di:*	id:4534
apercebi/SMTLQNu	po:v3	di:*	id:4627
aplanponhar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:4792
apondre/SMTLQNt	po:v3	di:*	id:4887
apropriar/SDQ	di:*	id:65323
arabic/slD	di:*	id:59025
ardre/t	di:*	id:5289
arreirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:5613
arroquèri/MTLQNw	di:*	id:5768
assadolar/SMTLQNa	po:v1	di:*	id:6067
ateirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:6512
ateni/MTLQNu	di:*	id:6563
atenuar/MTLQNaz	po:v1	di:*	id:6571
averar/SMTLQNa	po:v1	di:*	id:7343
avinhonés/slD	di:*	id:80600
avoar/MTLQNaz	po:v1	di:*	id:7449
avortar/MTLQNb	di:*	id:7481
bajocarai/x	di:*	id:7737
bajoquèri/w	di:*	id:7746
batre/th	po:v3	di:*	id:8397
benfasiái/v	po:v1	po:v3	di:*	id:8716
benvòli/u	di:*	id:8743
bordiu/s	di:*	id:9851
calligrafiar/azh	po:v1	di:*	id:77380
cantaucelaire/s	di:*	id:11980
cereisar/br	di:*	id:13068
closquèri/w	di:*	id:13540
cognitiu/sF	po:adj	di:*	id:65847
collocarai/x	di:*	id:14044
coltorciái/v	di:*	id:14018
cometre/th	di:*	id:14128
compari/u	di:*	id:14178
conqueriái/v	di:*	id:14649
consègui/u	di:*	id:14674
còrdolguèri/w	di:*	id:15155
còrfendre/th	po:v3	di:*	id:79221
coserai/x	di:*	id:15393
crenhiái/v	po:v3	di:*	id:15711
cresi/u	po:v3	di:*	id:15736
criptografiar/azh	po:v1	di:*	id:88559
crostós/sF	di:*	id:15948
defendre/th	di:*	id:16869
desbosquèri/w	di:*	id:17693
descendre/th	po:v3	di:*	id:17876
desconfirai/x	di:*	id:18024
desconfisiái/v	di:*	id:18028
descongeirar/brh	di:*	id:18035
desconoissi/u	di:*	id:18051
descuiar/azh	di:*	id:18228
desenfeirar/brh	di:*	id:18418
desmaneirar/brh	di:*	id:18919
desmesconeguèri/w	di:*	id:18986
desplasi/u	di:*	id:19325
despondre/th	di:*	id:19364
desponhiái/v	di:*	id:19373
destanherai/x	di:*	id:19628
destendre/th	di:*	id:19664
desviar/azh	di:*	id:19918
dispari/u	di:*	id:20249
dissolviái/v	po:v3	di:*	id:20287
documentacion/s	po:nom	is:fem	di:*	id:20399
droguèri/w	di:*	id:20636
embarreirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:21204
embonir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:21478
emejarai/x	di:*	id:21750
emocionar/MTLQNSb	po:v1	di:*	id:75143
empèrgui/TLQNc	po:v1	di:*	id:62862
encadeirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:22369
encendre/MTLQNt	di:*	id:22630
enchiprar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:22997
enconheirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:22816
enfagotèri/MTLQNd	di:*	id:23293
engangueirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:23712
engermenir/MTLQNi	di:*	id:23885
engrafiar/MTLQNazh	po:v1	di:*	id:24015
enneguèri/MTLQNw	di:*	id:24282
enquièri/MTLQNu	di:*	id:24338
enregistrar/SDMTLQNah	di:*	id:24475
enrisiái/MTLQNv	di:*	id:24510
entrairai/MTLQNx	di:*	id:24955
entrefoguèri/MTLQNw	di:*	id:25066
episcopal/slDQ	po:adj	is:mas	ip:cris	ip:reli	di:*	id:66228
escampar/SMTLQNa	po:v1	di:*	id:26079
esclausi/MTLQNu	di:*	id:26606
escometre/MTLQNt	di:*	id:26764
escorriái/MTLQNv	di:*	id:26895
escriguèri/SMTLQNw	po:v3	di:*	id:27009
esfondre/MTLQNt	di:*	id:27251
esgaiar/MTLQNza	di:*	id:27286
esperrecarai/MTLQNx	di:*	id:27890
espillar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:28031
espolseirar/MTLQNbr	di:*	id:28202
esquartariar/MTLQNaS	po:v1	di:*	id:65479
estimador/slD	di:*	id:28945
exclure/SDQl	po:v3	di:*	id:29714
expatriar/MTLQNza	po:v1	di:*	id:29780
exsudar/MTLQNa	di:*	id:29839
extrasi/MTLQNu	po:v3	di:*	id:29866
filmologia/s	po:nom	is:fem	di:*	id:80347
folhèri/w	di:*	id:31361
fondre/th	di:*	id:31423
gavèl/sF	di:*	id:32956
graduar/zah	di:*	id:33674
imprimir/NSlDQ	po:v2	di:*	id:89634
inclusissiái/MSTLQNv	po:v2	di:*	id:80137
incredibilitat/slDQ	po:nom	is:fem	di:*	id:77880
instigar/MTLQNgz	po:v1	di:*	id:34998
institucionalizar/Sah	po:v1	di:*	id:62765
iraisserai/MTLQNx	di:*	id:35276
laténcia/s	po:nom	is:fem	di:*	id:66523
litografiar/azh	po:v1	di:*	id:86394
maldiguèri/w	di:*	id:37261
maldisi/u	di:*	id:37268
mediái/v	di:*	id:38046
membre/S.()s	po:nom po:adj is:epi 
naissi/u	po:v3	di:*	id:39622
nogat/s	di:*	id:40027
obtendrai/MTLQNx	di:*	id:40344
ometre/SMTLQNth	po:v3	di:*	id:65593
onhiái/MTLQNv	di:*	id:40741
pasqueirar/brh	di:*	id:41927
pecèri/w	di:*	id:42305
persègui/u	di:*	id:42937
perveniái/v	po:v3	di:*	id:43022
piar/azh	di:*	id:43198
pondre/th	di:*	id:44103
porifèr/s	po:zool	di:*	id:60124
pregarai/x	di:*	id:44550
produsi/u	po:v3	di:*	id:44945
proroguèri/w	di:*	id:45080
recosi/u	di:*	id:46931
recreisserai/x	di:*	id:46958
rediguèri/w	di:*	id:47075
redisiái/v	di:*	id:47083
refondre/th	po:v3	di:*	id:47215
repudiar/azh	di:*	id:48167
ressegarai/x	po:v1	di:*	id:48403
resseguèri/w	di:*	id:48411
retenhi/u	di:*	id:48571
revendre/th	di:*	id:48743
roissiái/v	di:*	id:49193
rutèni/s	po:nom	is:mas	ip:quim	di:*	id:59869
semondre/th	di:*	id:51007
siaguèri/w	po:v3	di:*	id:74507
sinhocarai/x	di:*	id:51450
sospechar/br	po:v1	di:*	id:52045
sostrasi/u	di:*	id:52106
susveniái/v	di:*	id:52502
tartocarai/x	di:*	id:52929
tondre/th	di:*	id:53826
trevandièra/s	di:*	id:54801
umiliar/azh	po:v1	di:*	id:55314
utilizar/SMTLQNa	po:v1	di:*	id:55421
viatgèri/w	po:v1	di:*	id:74604
viurai/x	po:v3	di:*	id:56331
